Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-521
Violations; penalty; liability to property owner.

Any person violating sections 37-516 to 37-519 shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor. In addition, any person who damages crops, fields, livestock, fences, gates, timber, water, or any other property by the use of any aircraft, vessel, vehicle, snowmobile, or other conveyance shall be liable to the property owner.

Laws 1978, LB 828, § 6;

Laws 1995, LB 274, § 7;

R.S.Supp.,1996, § 37-533;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 241.